New York, session 2025-2026, A8113.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 5 of chapter 462 of the laws of 2015, amending the 2 elder law relating to long term care ombudsman access to assisted living 3 facilities, as amended by chapter 303 of the laws of 2023, is amended to 4 read as follows: 5 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately; provided however that the 6 amendments to paragraph [(b)] (d) of subdivision 1 of section 218 of the 7 elder law made by section two of this act shall take effect December 31, 8 [2025] 2027; provided, however, that the provisions of section four of 9 this act shall expire on the same date as section two of this act takes 10 effect when upon such date the provisions of section four of this act 11 shall be deemed repealed. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11726-01-5